nb: Sportsutstyr > Friidrett > Vannpolo > Treningshjelpemidler for vannpolo: Treningshjelpemidler for keepere; Treningsutstyr for vannpolo; Pasningsmål for vannpolo; Rebound-brett for vannpolo; Skyteskiver for vannpolo; Ryggsekker for vannpolotrening; Treningssekker for vannpolo; Treningsfinner for vannpolo; Treningsvester for vannpolo
da: Sportsartikler > Atletik > Vandpolo > Træningshjælpemidler til vandpolo: Hjælpemidler til træning af målmand; Vandpolofitnessudstyr; Vandpoloafleveringsmål; Vandpolobander; Vandpoloskydemål; Træningsrygsække til vandpolo; Træningstasker til vandpolo; Svømmefødder til vandpolo; Træningsveste til vandpolo
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 田径 > 水球运动 > 水球训练辅助用品: 守门员训练辅助用品; 水球健身器材; 水球传球靶; 水球反弹板; 水球击球靶; 水球训练背包; 水球训练包; 水球训练脚蹼; 水球训练背心
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Atletism > Polo pe apă > Articole antrenament pentru polo pe apă: Articole antrenament portar; Echipamente de fitness pentru polo pe apă; Ținte pentru pase pentru polo pe apă; Plăci ricoșeu pentru polo pe apă; Ținte aruncări pentru polo pe apă; Rucsacuri pentru antrenamente de polo pe apă; Genți antrenament pentru polo pe apă; Labe de antrenament pentru polo pe apă; Veste de antrenament pentru polo pe apă
ja: スポーツ用品 > スポーツ競技 > 水球用品 > 水球練習器具: ゴールキーパー練習器具; 水球用フィットネス機器; 水球パスターゲット; 水球リバウンドボード; 水球シュートターゲット; 水球用トレーニングバックパック; 水球練習バッグ; 水球トレーニングフィン; 水球トレーニングベスト
hu: Sportszerek > Atlétika > Vízilabda > Vízilabda edzési segédeszközök: Kapusedzés-segédek; Vízilabda-fitneszfelszerelések; Vízilabda-passzcélpontok; Vízilabda visszapattanó deszkák; Vízilabda-lövőcélpontok; Vízilabda-edzőhátizsákok; Vízilabda-edzőtáskák; Vízilabda-edzőuszonyok; Vízilabda-edzőmellények
fr: Équipements sportifs > Divers sports > Water polo > Aides à l’entraînement au water-polo: Aides à l’entraînement des gardiens de but; Équipement de fitness pour le water-polo; Cibles de passe de water-polo; Planches de rebond de water-polo; Cibles de tir de water-polo; Sacs à dos d’entraînement de water-polo; Sacs d’entraînement de water-polo; Palmes d’entraînement de water-polo; Gilets d’entraînement de water-polo
nl: Sportartikelen > Lichaamssporten > Waterpolo > Waterpolotrainingshulpmiddelen: Keepertrainingshulpmiddelen; Waterpolofitnesstoestellen; Waterpolopasseerdoelwitten; Waterpolo-reboundplanken; Waterpoloschietdoelwitten; Waterpolotrainingsrugzakken; Waterpolotrainingstassen; Waterpolotrainingszwemvliezen; Waterpolotrainingsvesten
sv: Sportartiklar > Idrott och sport > Vattenpolo > Träningshjälpmedel för vattenpolo: Målvaktsträningshjälpmedel; Fitnessutrustning för vattenpolo; Vattenpolopassningsmåltavlor; Vattenpoloreturskivor; Vattenpoloskottmåltavlor; Träningsryggsäckar för vattenpolo; Träningsväskor för vattenpolo; Träningsfenor för vattenpolo; Träningsvästar för vattenpolo
en: Sporting Goods > Athletics > Water Polo > Water Polo Training Aids: Goalkeeper Training Aids; Water Polo Fitness Equipment; Water Polo Passing Targets; Water Polo Rebound Boards; Water Polo Shooting Targets; Water Polo Training Backpacks; Water Polo Training Bags; Water Polo Training Fins; Water Polo Training Vests
ru: Спортивные товары > Соревновательный спорт > Водное поло > Тренировочный инвентарь для водного поло: Тренировочный инвентарь для вратарей; Инвентарь для фитнес-тренировок для водного поло; Мишени для отработки пасов для водного поло; Тренажеры-стенки для водного поло; Мишени для отработки бросков по воротам для водного поло; Рюкзаки для тренировок по водному поло; Сумки для тренировок по водному поло; Ласты для тренировок по водному поло; Жилеты для тренировок по водному поло
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Điền kinh > Bóng nước > Dụng cụ hỗ trợ luyện tập bóng nước: Dụng cụ hỗ trợ tập luyện thủ môn; Thiết bị thể dục luyện tập bóng nước; Mục tiêu chuyền bóng nước; Ván bật lại luyện tập bóng nước; Mục tiêu ném bóng nước; Ba lô đựng đồ luyện tập bóng nước; Túi đựng đồ luyện tập bóng nước; Chân vịt luyện tập bóng nước; Áo phao luyện tập bóng nước
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Atletika > Vodné pólo > Tréningové pomôcky pre vodné pólo: Tréningové pomôcky pre brankárov; Fitness vybavenie pre vodné pólo; Prihrávkové terče pre vodné pól; Odrazové dosky pre vodné pólo; Strelecké terče pre vodné pólo; Tréningové batohy na vodné pólo; Tréningové tašky na vodné pólo; Tréningové plutvy na vodné pólo; Tréningové vesty na vodné pólo
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Sport > Piłka wodna > Pomoce treningowe do piłki wodnej: Pomoce treningowe dla bramkarzy; Sprzęt fitness do piłki wodnej; Cele podań w piłce wodnej; Odbijacze do piłki wodnej; Cele strzeleckie do piłki wodnej; Plecaki treningowe do piłki wodnej; Torby treningowe do piłki wodnej; Płetwy treningowe do piłki wodnej; Kamizelki treningowe do piłki wodnej
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Spor Ekipmanları > Su Polosu > Sutopu Eğitim Araçları: Kaleci Eğitim Araçları; Sutopu Fitness Aletleri; Su Topu Pas Hedefleri; Su Topu Ribaund Tahtaları; Sutopu Hedef Atışı; Sutopu Eğitim Sırt Çantaları; Sutopu Eğitim Çantaları; Sutopu Eğitim Paletleri; Sutopu Eğitim Yelekleri
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Atletika > Vandensvydis > Vandensvydžio treniruočių pagalbinės priemonės: Vartininkų treniruočių priemonės; Vandensvydžio treniruočių įranga; Vandensvydžio perdavimų taikiniai; Vandensvydžio atšokimo lentos; Vandensvydžio mėtymo taikiniai; Vandensvydžio treniruočių kuprinės; Vandensvydžio treniruočių krepšiai; Vandensvydžio treniruočių plaukmenys; Vandensvydžio treniruočių liemenės
it: Articoli sportivi > Sport > Pallanuoto > Ausili per l'allenamento della pallanuoto: Ausili per la formazione del portiere; Attrezzatura fitness per pallanuoto; Obiettivi di passaggio della pallanuoto; Tavole da rimbalzo per pallanuoto; Bersagli da tiro di pallanuoto; Zaini da allenamento per pallanuoto; Borse da allenamento per pallanuoto; Pinne da allenamento per pallanuoto; Gilet da allenamento per pallanuoto
ko: 스포츠용품 > 운동 > 수구 > 수구 훈련 장비: 골기퍼 훈련 장비; 수구 피트니스 장비; 수구 패스 연습 타겟; 수구 리바운드 보드; 수구 슈팅 타겟; 수구 트레이닝 배낭; 수구 트레이닝 가방; 수구 훈련용 오리발; 수구 훈련용 조끼
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания > Водна топка > Помощни средства за тренировки по водна топка: Помощни средства за тренировка на вратари; Фитнес оборудване за водна топка; Мишени за отработване на пасове за водна топка; Мрежи за рикошет за водна топка; Тренировъчни мишени за водна топка; Раници за тренировки по водна топка; Чанти за тренировки по водна топка; Плавници за тренировка по водна топка; Жилетки за тренировки по водна топка
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Artigos para prática de esportes > Polo aquático > Auxílios de treinamento para polo aquático: Auxílios de treinamento para goleiros; Equipamento de ginástica para polo aquático; Alvos de passe para polo aquático; Pranchas de rebote para polo aquático; Alvos de tiro para polo aquático; Mochilas de treino para polo aquático; Bolsas de treinamento para polo aquático; Nadadeiras de treino para polo aquático; Coletes de treino para polo aquático
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividade desportiva > Polo-aquático > Auxiliares de treino para polo aquático: Auxiliares de treino para guarda-redes; Equipamento de fitness para polo aquático; Alvos de passe para pólo aquático; Placas de ressalto para polo aquático; Alvos de lançamento para pólo aquático; Mochilas de treino para polo aquático; Sacos de treino para polo aquático; Barbatanas de treino para polo aquático; Coletes de treino para polo aquático
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > การกีฬา > โปโลน้ำ > อุปกรณ์ช่วยฝึกโปโลน้ำ: อุปกรณ์ช่วยฝึกซ้อมผู้รักษาประตู; อุปกรณ์ฟิตเนสสำหรับกีฬาโปโลน้ำ; เป้าหมายการส่งลูกโปโลน้ำ; กระดานเด้งลูกโปโลน้ำ; เป้าหมายการยิงโปโลน้ำ; เป้สะพายหลังสำหรับฝึกซ้อมโปโลน้ำ; กระเป๋าฝึกซ้อมโปโลน้ำ; ตีนกบสำหรับฝึกซ้อมโปโลน้ำ; เสื้อฝึกซ้อมโปโลน้ำ
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Atletika > Vaterpolo > Pomagala za trening vaterpola: Pomagala za vratara; Fitness oprema za vaterpolo; Mete za dodavanje u vaterpolu; Odbijajuće ploče za vaterpolo; Mete za gađanje u vaterpolu; Ruksaci za trening vaterpola; Torbe za trening vaterpola; Peraje za trening vaterpola; Prsluci za trening vaterpola
de: Sportartikel > Athletik > Wasserball > Wasserball-Trainingshilfen: Trainingshilfen für Torwarte; Wasserball-Fitnessgeräte; Wasserball-Passübungsziele; Wasserball-Rebound-Boards; Wasserball-Schussziele; Wasserball-Trainingsrucksäcke; Wasserball-Trainingstaschen; Wasserball-Trainingsflossen; Wasserball-Trainingswesten
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 競技體育 > 水球 > 水球訓練輔助工具: 水球守門員訓練輔助工具; 水球健身器材; 水球傳球靶; 水球練習板; 水球射球靶; 水球訓練背包; 水球訓練包; 水球訓練用蛙鞋; 水球訓練背心
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Equipamiento para atletismo > Waterpolo > Ayudas para el entrenamiento de waterpolo: Ayudas para el entrenamiento de porteros; Equipo de gimnasia para waterpolo; Objetivos de los pases de waterpolo; Tablas de rebote de waterpolo; Dianas de tiro para waterpolo; Mochilas de entrenamiento de waterpolo; Bolsas de entrenamiento de waterpolo; Aletas de entrenamiento para waterpolo; Chalecos de entrenamiento para waterpolo
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Šport > Vaterpolo > Pripomočki za vadbo vaterpola: Pripomočki za vadbo vratarjev; Fitnes oprema za vaterpolo; Tarče za podajanje v vaterpolu; Odbojne deske za vaterpolo; Tarče za vaterpolo; Nahrbtniki za vadbo vaterpola; Torbe za vadbo vaterpola; Plavutke za vadbo vaterpola; Jopiči za vadbo vaterpola
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Urheilu > Vesipallo > Vesipallon harjoitteluvälineet: Maalivahdin harjoitteluvälineet; Vesipoolon kuntolaitteet; Vesipoolon ohitusmaalit; Vesipallon palautuslaudat; Vesipoolon syöttömaalit; Vesipallon harjoittelureput; Vesipoolon harjoittelukassit; Vesipoolon harjoitteluräpylät; Vesipoolon harjoitteluliivit
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Atletické sporty > Vodní pólo > Tréninkové pomůcky na vodní pólo: Tréninkové pomůcky pro brankáře; Fitness vybavení pro vodní pólo; Terče pro trénování přesnosti přihrávek ve vodním pólu; Odrážecí trenažéry na trénink vodního póla; Střelecké cíle pro vodní pólo; Tréninkové batohy na vodní pólo; Tréninkové tašky pro vodní pólo; Ploutve pro trénink vodního póla; Vesty pro trénink vodního póla
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Αθλητισμός > Πόλο (υδατοσφαίριση) > Βοηθήματα προπόνησης πόλο: Βοηθήματα προπόνησης τερματοφύλακα; Εξοπλισμός γυμναστικής για πόλο; Στόχοι πάσας πόλο; Σανίδες ανάκρουσης πόλο; Στόχοι για εξάσκηση σκοραρίσματος στο πόλο; Σακίδια προπόνησης πόλο; Σάκοι προπόνησης πόλο; Πέδιλα κολύμβησης πόλο; Γιλέκα προπόνησης πόλο